Maine, session 132, LD267.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §458 is enacted to read:
§458. Appearance of counsel by remote methods
Unless the court orders otherwise in the interests of justice, the court shall schedule
pretrial nontestimonial criminal matters in a manner that permits the appearance of counsel
by remote methods to the greatest extent possible. As used in this section, "remote
methods" has the same meaning as in Title 1, section 403-B, subsection 1.
Page 1 - 132LR0346(03)